Mississippi, session 2026, HB342.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  Various segments of the state public roadway system in the State of Mississippi shall be designated as "Memorial Highways" in honor of the several individuals for whom resolutions, officially and duly adopted by the relevant local governing authorities, and spread upon its minutes, requesting the designations of such, have been provided to the Transportation Committees of the House of Representatives and Mississippi Senate indicating the desire for the identified segments to be so named. (2) The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segments of the roadway to be described as prescribed in this section. SECTION 2.  (1)  The segment of Mississippi Highway 370 located in Itawamba County, Mississippi, beginning at the Lee-Itawamba County Line, and extending in the easterly direction to its intersection with Houston-Palestine Road in Itawamba County, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the "Roger Campbell Memorial Highway." (2)  The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section. SECTION 3.  (1)  The segment of Mississippi Highway 363 located in Itawamba County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with Centerville Road, and extending in the northwesterly direction to its intersection with Hall Road in Itawamba County, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the "Jakob Edward Kindt Memorial Highway." (2)  The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.